Mississippi statutes. Title 29. Public Lands, Buildings and Property
Chapter 13. Flood Insurance for State-Owned Buildings

§ 29-13-1.
Purchase of business property insurance and business personal property insurance on all state-owned buildings and contents thereof; participation in National Flood Insurance Program.

The Department of Finance and Administration (“department”) shall purchase and maintain business property insurance and business personal property insurance on all state-owned buildings and/or contents as required by federal law and regulations of the Federal Emergency Management Agency (FEMA) as is necessary for receiving public assistance or reimbursement for repair, reconstruction, replacement or other damage to those buildings and/or contents caused by the Hurricane Katrina Disaster of 2005 or subsequent disasters. The department is authorized to expend funds from any available source for the purpose of obtaining and maintaining that property insurance. The department is authorized to enter into agreements with other state agencies, local school districts, community/junior college districts, state institutions of higher learning and community hospitals to pool their liabilities to participate in a group business property and/or business personal property insurance program, subject to uniform rules and regulations as may be adopted by the Department of Finance and Administration.

The Department of Finance and Administration is required to purchase and maintain flood insurance under the National Flood Insurance Program (42 USCS, Section 4001 et seq.) as required by federal law on state-owned buildings and/or contents. To meet the requirements of participation in such program, the department is further required to adopt floodplain management criteria and procedures in accordance with the rules and regulations of 24 CFR, Chapter X, Subchapter B (National Flood Insurance Program), established by the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development pursuant to the National Flood Insurance Act of 1968 (Public Law 90-448) as amended and by the Flood Disaster Protection Act of 1973 (Public Law 93-234) as amended, and any supplemental changes to such rules and regulations. The department shall adopt the floodplain management criteria set forth in 24 CFR, Chapter X, Section 1910.3, on an emergency basis immediately upon passage of this chapter and until such time as final regulations and criteria are developed by the department. Final regulations, criteria and procedures shall be implemented by the department within ninety (90) days after passage of this chapter. Such criteria and procedures shall apply to any new construction or substantial improvement of state-owned buildings and other state-owned development located in floodplain areas as identified in conjunction with the National Flood Insurance Program. The department shall enforce the floodplain management criteria and procedures adopted by the department pursuant to this section.

No state agency shall be authorized to expend any state, federal or special funds for the construction, renovation, repair or placement of any structure in a designated floodplain, floodway or coastal high hazard area, or to allow for the construction, renovation, repair or placement of any privately owned structure onto state-owned land in a designated floodplain, floodway or coastal high hazard area unless such agency has previously obtained the necessary permits required by the Department of Finance and Administration to comply with the regulations of the Federal Emergency Management Agency (FEMA), National Flood Insurance Program and the state’s floodplain management regulations.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, 1st Ex Sess. ch. 5, § 1; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 191; Laws, 1994, ch. 449, § 1; Laws, 2005, 5th Ex Sess, ch. 24, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Oct. 24, 2005).

§ 29-13-3.
Filing claims; expenditures.

The Department of Finance and Administration shall file any claims for damages covered under the Hurricane Katrina Disaster of 2005 or subsequent flood insurance policies purchased pursuant to Section 29-13-1. The proceeds of any such claim for damage to a state-owned building shall be paid to the Department of Finance and Administration and the State of Mississippi, which is authorized to expend such proceeds to repair or replace such damaged building.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, 1st Ex Sess. ch. 5, § 2; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 192; Laws, 1992, ch. 396, § 1; Laws, 2005, 5th Ex Sess, ch. 24, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved Oct. 24, 2005).

§ 29-13-5.
Inventory of state-owned buildings in flood plain areas.

The Department of Finance and Administration shall compile an inventory of all state-owned buildings in any area of the state affected by the Hurricane Katrina Disaster of 2005 or any floodplain areas and any necessary data concerning such buildings. Each agency, board, commission, department and institution of the state shall cooperate in the preparation of the inventory and shall submit any information required by the department in a timely manner which will allow the inventory to be finalized and presented to the appropriate federal and state agencies. Such information shall include the specific location and, where available, the elevation of all state-owned buildings under the jurisdiction of the agency, board, commission, department or institution in any hurricane hazard or floodplain areas.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, 1st Ex Sess. ch. 5, § 3; Laws, 2005, 5th Ex Sess, ch. 24, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved Oct. 24, 2005).